Arkansas, session 2025, HB1813.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 3, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 8 — Fair and Efficient Transmission Compact

23-3-801. Text of compact.
The Fair and Efficient Transmission Compact is enacted into law and
entered into by this state with all states legally joining therein and in the
form substantially as follows:

FAIR AND EFFICIENT TRANSMISSION COMPACT

Article 1 — Statement of Purpose, Findings and Declaration of Policy
The intent of the Fair and Efficient Transmission Compact ("Compact") is to
lower the cost of construction of new high-voltage transmission
infrastructure and facilitate the expansion of transmission capacity through
cost-effective transmission planning, siting and construction.
The mid-South region is experiencing rapid growth in energy demand as
business and industry of all types seek to build, expand and relocate to
*ANS358*
04-10-2025 09:29:19 ANS358

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 H4/10/25 HB1813
areas that have an abundance of affordable and reliable energy resources.
This economic growth benefits citizens by creating jobs, increasing local
revenues, and supporting new business opportunities.
To ensure that the states in the mid-South region participate in this
transformative economy, the parties to this Compact understand that new
transmission capacity must be added to the grid and will pursue measures
necessary to attract infrastructure investments to advance innovation, use of
improved technology and enhance our national security.
A robust, multi-state, regional transmission system provides a range of
benefits for citizens and consumers, including access to all types of
generation resources, economic development activity, and enhanced grid
resiliency in the face of multiple threats. However, certain policies and
regulatory inaction have hampered the ability to modernize and expand
transmission assets in the mid-South region.
By entering into this Compact, the participating states affirm that policies
that encourage and allow for a competitive transmission construction bidding
process is in the public interest and in the best interest of electric
ratepayers and the electric marketplace. While the independence and special
needs of each state are to be recognized and safeguarded, today’s regional
and interregional transmission needs require cooperative action among states
to avoid the application of discriminatory, anti-competitive policies and
allow different companies to compete for the opportunity to construct new
transmission infrastructure.

Article 2 – Definitions
Compact – An interstate legal agreement or document between the states
of Arkansas, Louisiana, Mississippi and Texas
Electric Transmission – The process of moving bulk electricity from
power generation stations to where it is consumed by end-use customers.
Infrastructure involved includes high-voltage power lines, substations,
transformers and associated equipment.
Grid-Enhancing Technologies (GETs) – The use of advanced
transmission technologies and analytical tools to maximize the use of
electricity across the existing (and future) high voltage transmission system
that include dynamic flow rating sensors, power flow control devices,
advanced conductors, and improved viability of inverter-based generation
04-10-2025 09:29:19 ANS358

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 H4/10/25 HB1813
availability.
Load — Shall refer to any device, system, or process that demands
electricity to perform a specific task.
Long Range Transmission Planning – This is an open, structured effort
to expand the transmission system in a multi-state, regional and
interregional area to meet the economic development opportunities, generation
interconnection requests, base line reliability requirements and resiliency
with improved economic and operational characteristics of the transmission
system.
MISO - Midcontinent Independent System Operator is an independent, not-
for-profit, member-based regional transmission organization (RTO) in the
central portion of the United States from Canada to the Gulf of Mexico and is
responsible for keeping the power flowing across its geographic region
reliably and cost effectively.
MISO South – A subregion of MISO that includes parts of the states of
Arkansas, Louisiana, Mississippi and Texas.
Open Bidding Process – A process to allow competitive bidding by
different qualified entities to design, construct, and own new transmission
projects to expand the existing transmission system.
Regional Transmission Organizations (RTO) - This is an independent,
organization that manages the transmission of electricity across multiple
states. RTOs are responsible for ensuring the reliability of the power
supply and balance between supply (usually generation) and demand (load
connected to the transmission system).
State Regulatory Entities – The present state or local authorized
regulatory entities (public utility commissions or city council) providing an
oversight and policy direction for utilities within a state or local area
which are authorized by the various state constitutions and laws.
SPP – Southwest Power Pool is a regional transmission
organization (RTO) in the central, southwest and northwestern parts of the
United States; a nonprofit corporation mandated by the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission to ensure the reliable supply of power, adequate
transmission infrastructure and competitive wholesale electric prices on the
behalf of its members.

Article 3 – Council Established
04-10-2025 09:29:19 ANS358

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 H4/10/25 HB1813
There is hereby created an agency of the party states to be known as the Fair
and Efficient Transmission Council (“Council”) to administer the Compact.
The Council shall commence operations upon adoption of the Compact by at
least three of the party states in the mid-South region. The Council shall
be composed of delegations from each party state that has adopted the
Compact. Each delegation shall be composed of three representatives from
each state, one of whom shall be appointed or designated in each party state
to represent the Governor, the State Senate, and the State House of
Representatives, respectively. One Council representative shall be appointed
by the Governor. One Council representative shall be appointed by the
presiding officer of each chamber of the General Assembly, or in such other
manner as the General Assembly may provide. Each Council representative
shall be designated or appointed in accordance with the law of the state
which he or she represents and serving and subject to removal in accordance
with such law. Any member of the Council may provide for the discharge of
his or her duties and the performance of his or her functions thereon (either
for the duration of his membership or for any lesser period) by a deputy or
assistant, if the laws of his state make specific provision for this
assignment of these responsibilities. This assignment of a deputy or
assistant shall be sent to the Executive Director or Chairman of the Council
in writing prior to the event or meeting where the deputy or assistant will
represent the Council representative.
Each member of the Council shall be entitled to one vote each. No action of
the Council shall be binding unless taken at a meeting at which a majority of
all party states are represented and unless a majority of the total number of
votes on the Council are cast in favor thereof.
The Council shall appoint an Executive Director who will serve at its
pleasure and who shall act as the Secretary. The Executive Director, with
the approval of the Council, shall appoint and discharge such personnel as
may be necessary for the performance of the Council’s activities. This
Council shall meet at least once a year. The Council, with the assistance of
the Executive Director, will develop Bylaws to assist in the activities
associated with its operation.

Article 4 – The Council
The Council shall not be construed to displace the regulatory
04-10-2025 09:29:19 ANS358

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 H4/10/25 HB1813
responsibilities of the existing relevant electric rate regulatory
authorities. The Council shall prepare and keep current guidelines for fair
and efficient transmission construction that support an open bidding process
for new transmission facilities. These guidelines shall be developed within
one year of the creation of the Council.
The Council shall elect, from among its members, a Chairman, a Chairman-
Elect, and a Treasurer. Elections shall be annual. The Chairman-Elect shall
succeed to the office of Chairman for the year following his service as
Chairman-Elect. For purposes of the election and service of officers of the
Council, the year shall be deemed to commence at the conclusion of the annual
meeting of the Council and terminate at the conclusion of the next annual
meeting thereof.
The Council annually will prepare a report for the Governor, the respective
Public Service Commission or Public Utility Commission (Commission), such as
the Arkansas Public Service Commission, and the General Assembly of each
party state. This report will cover the activities of the Council. This
report will also provide guidance to the party states by recommending
changes, if any, to the rules and laws regulating the siting, permitting,
certification, and construction of new or existing high-voltage transmission
infrastructure according to the principles of the Compact.

Article 5 – Principles of Fair and Efficient Transmission Construction
States that enter into and become a party to the Compact shall consider the
following principles and recommend policies, if any, that allow for a
competitive, fair and efficient transmission market to flourish in the mid-
South region:
1. Energy Agnostic. State statutes, regulations, ordinances and
policies should not discriminate against any particular energy resource,
energy generation method or procured energy type. Technology agnostic energy
policies ensure that energy sources are chosen based on cost and reliability.
State policies must reflect an openness to using a variety of energy
resources, rather than a limit to a single type of energy.
2. Transmission Project Cost Allocation. The cost of new transmission
projects should be allocated holistically to all entities, that cause these
costs and that directly benefit, in a manner that is roughly commensurate
with, and proportional to, the costs caused and benefits received by those
04-10-2025 09:29:19 ANS358

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 H4/10/25 HB1813
projects. The cost allocation should be as granular and accurate as possible
while avoiding the targeting of specific industries. Costs should not be
assigned to parties that receive negligible or negative benefits.
3. Application of Interstate Compact. This agreement will be
submitted to and reviewed by each state legislative body for approval. Once
the Compact is approved, the Compact shall apply to all states equally
regardless of the time of adoption compared to the establishment of the
Compact. States will have equal representation, equal authority and equal
protection in the adoption and execution of a competitive bidding framework
and process.
4. Uniform Siting and Certification of Transmission Projects. This
Compact shall consider establishment of two separate processes for siting and
certification of transmission projects. The states participating in this
Compact may develop a uniform siting process and/or separate certification
standards as a condition of joining the Compact. Participating states may
adopt the mutually agreed upon processes for siting and certification of new
transmission projects, especially when demonstrated efficiencies can be
achieved. These processes must define a clear start date and define the party
responsible for initiating the process start date. The use of this uniform
siting and certification process may be used to minimize the time needed for
approval in additional states, once the first state has provided its approval
for interregional transmission projects. The member states’ processes for
siting, certification, and permitting should provide a clear understanding
for relevant stakeholders.
5. Valuing Grid-Enhancing Technologies. Grid-enhancing technologies
(GETs) have been demonstrated to provide economic, operational and
reliability benefits and can be a timelier and/or cost-effective solution as
compared to new transmission line development. The Council is encouraged to
recognize the benefits of utilizing GETs for improvement of transmission
facilities, enhancement of grid performance and expansion of existing
transmission line capacity. States adopting the Compact should streamline
permitting and regulatory reviews for utilization of GETs. Furthermore,
member states of the Compact should provide for the assurance that GETs
receive fair monetary valuation in any transmission developer’s competitive
bid.
6. Competitive Construction Bid Process. This Compact intends to
04-10-2025 09:29:19 ANS358

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 H4/10/25 HB1813
promote intrastate and interstate transmission development and enhancement
and embrace the minimization of costs using an open bidding process. The
open bidding process should consider benefits to ratepayers including but not
limited to ensuring reliability, ratepayer cost savings, maximizing grid
efficiency, reducing grid congestion, and mitigating against grid stressing
events. The states participating in the Compact shall consider and adopt
into this Compact a process for the administration and oversight of the bid
opening and selection process. The participants in this Compact may choose
to allow MISO to administer an open competitive bid selection process for the
construction of certain transmission projects. The present MISO process for
projects identified through Long Range Transmission Planning allow for
competitive bid processes for proposed new transmission projects. The
information on these MISO processes can be found in the Competitive
Transmission Process in Business Practice Manual BP-027 and Minimum Project
Requirements for Competitive Transmission Projects BP-029 both dated
1/25/2025.
7. Waiver for Existing Transmission Infrastructure. Existing
transmission infrastructure that has previously been permitted by states
participating in the Compact should not be required to obtain new permits for
the purpose of upgrading, maintenance or renovation activities. Transmission
projects permitted to be constructed but delayed due to actions and matters
beyond the control of the developer should not be forced to engage in the
permitting process if the original permits were obtained within a previous
10-year period. States participating in this Compact may take action to
remove permitting barriers at applicable state agencies and regional bodies.

Article 6 - Construction and Severability
This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes
thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any
phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact is declared to be
contrary to the constitution of any state or of the United States, or the
application thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held
invalid, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability
thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be
affected thereby. If this Compact shall be held contrary to the constitution
of any state participating therein, the Compact shall remain in full force
04-10-2025 09:29:19 ANS358

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 H4/10/25 HB1813
and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

Article 7 — Finances
The costs associated with the Council’s administration and operational
activities will be supported by an equal assessment to each state represented
on the Council. The Council will maintain adequate records to support the
expenses of operating this Council. No contracts with the Council will be
entered into or expenses incurred to support the Council’s activities without
a majority affirmative vote of its members.

23-3-802. Administration of Fair and Efficient Transmission Compact —
Rules.
(a) The various states party to the Fair and Efficient Transmission
Compact will rely on their respective Public Service Commission or Public
Utility Commission (Commission), such as the Arkansas Public Service
Commission, to administer the compact. A state’s Commission will be the
compact administrator for that state, unless administration of the compact
causes conflicts with existing laws, rules, or authorities that govern the
function and conduct of the Commission. In such case, a state may assign
responsibility to administer the compact to another agency capable of such
responsibility.
(b) A Commission may adopt rules that are consistent with the compact
necessary to implement this subchapter and are consistent with the principles
in Article 5 of the compact.
(c) A Commission is not required to adopt the rules of the Fair and
Efficient Transmission Council for the rules of the Fair and Efficient
Transmission Council to be effective in this state.
(d) For the purposes of the member state's ability to reject a rule
under Article 4 of the compact, a state may delegate its authority in this
provision to its Legislature, General Assembly, or a duly authorized and
recognized Legislative Council or Committee thereof.

/s/Gramlich



04-10-2025 09:29:19 ANS358